src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/es-g2.ctb
begword compr 36-1234-1235
begword contr 25-2345-1235
begword consu 25-234-136
begword congr 25-1245-1235
begword concr 25-14-1235
begword condr 25-145-1235
begword disgr 245-1245-1235
begword distr 256-2345-1235
begword entrecr 356-14-1235
begword extr 1346-3245-1235
begword expr 1346-1234-1235
begword interpr 13456-1234-1235
begword intergr 13456-1245-1235
begword pregr 235-1245-1235
begword prepr 235-1234-1235
begword retr 1235-2345-1235
begword repr 1235-1234-1235
begword regr 1235-1245-1235
begword recr 1235-14-1235
begword rebr 1235-12-1235
begword redr 1235-145-1235
begword sobrepr 23-1234-1235

# A word beginning should be followed by at least a consonant and a vowel or a consonant
# and a stenographic contraction. Some words are thus entirely uncontracted. Again, very
# few ones in the language.

word red 1235-15-145
word rey 1235-15-13456
word res 1235-15-234
word sobren 234-135-23-25
word extra 1346-2345-1235-1
word sobres 234-135-23-1246

# exceptions to the entire table, words which may never be contracted or brailled
# differently to avoid confussion with other contracted words
word vodca 1236-135-14-145-1
word entrenen 15-1345-356-26-26
word as 1-234
word os 135-234
word ion 24-135-1345

# Whenever some partword contractions overlap, such as ad and dr, in a single word
# (ladrillo) the dr contraction is preferred. Setting the only six cases where this can
# occur.

always adr 1-256
always uen 136-26
always quem 12345-126
always uem 136-126
always uer 136-236
always ues 136-1246

# some cases for word endings (prioritization)

endword emando 126-146-145
endword emandos 126-146-145-234
endword imando 345-146-145
endword imandos 345-146-145-234
endword emente 15-134
endword ementes 15-134-234
endword imente 24-134
endword imentes 24-134-234
